California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(5) “Violence prevention services” means evidence-based, trauma-informed, and culturally responsive preventive services provided to reduce the incidence of violent injury or reinjury, trauma, and related harms and promote trauma recovery, stabilization, and improved health
 outcomes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 101.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.01.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a community clinic or free clinic licensed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1204 of the Health and Safety Code or an intermittent clinic operating pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code, that has a valid license pursuant to Article 13 (commencing with Section 4180) of Chapter 9 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code shall bill and be reimbursed, as described in this section, for drugs and supplies covered under the Medi-Cal program and
 Family PACT Waiver Program.

(b) (1) A clinic described in subdivision (a) shall bill the Medi-Cal program and Family PACT Waiver Program for drugs and supplies covered under those programs at the lesser of cost or the clinic’s usual charge made to the general public.

(2) For purposes of this section, “cost” means an aggregate amount equivalent to the sum of the actual acquisition cost of a drug or supply plus a clinic dispensing fee not to exceed twelve dollars ($12) per billing unit as identified in either the Family PACT Policies, Procedures, and Billing Instructions Manual, or the Medi-Cal Inpatient/Outpatient Provider Manual governing outpatient clinic billing for drugs and supplies, as applicable. For purposes of this section, “cost” for a take-home drug that is dispensed for use by the patient within a specific timeframe of five or less days from the
 date medically indicated means actual acquisition cost for that drug plus a clinic dispensing fee, not to exceed seventeen dollars ($17) per prescription. Reimbursement shall be at the lesser of the amount billed or the Medi-Cal reimbursement rate, and shall not exceed the net cost of these drugs or supplies when provided by retail pharmacies under the Medi-Cal program.

(c) A clinic described in subdivision (a) that furnishes services free of charge, or at a nominal charge, as defined in subsection (a) of Section 413.13 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or that can demonstrate to the department, upon request, that it serves primarily low-income patients, and its customary practice is to charge patients on the basis of their ability to pay, shall not be subject to reimbursement reductions based on its usual charge to the general public.

(d) Federally qualified health
 centers and rural health clinics that are clinics as described in subdivision (a) may bill and be reimbursed as described in this section, upon electing to be reimbursed for pharmaceutical goods and services on a fee-for-service basis, as permitted by subdivision (k) of Section 14132.100.

(e) A clinic that otherwise meets the qualifications set forth in subdivision (a), that is eligible to, but that has elected not to, utilize drugs purchased under the 340B Discount Drug Program for its Medi-Cal patients, shall provide notification to the Health Resources and Services Administration’s Office of Pharmacy Affairs that it is utilizing non-340B drugs for its Medi-Cal patients in the manner and to the extent required by federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 503, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.02.

(a) The department shall seek approval from the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services to provide individuals made eligible pursuant to Section 14005.60 with the alternative benefit package option authorized by Section 1396u-7(b)(1)(D) of Title 42 of the United States Code. Effective January 1, 2014, the alternative benefit package shall provide the same schedule of benefits provided to full-scope Medi-Cal beneficiaries qualifying under the modified adjusted gross income standard pursuant to Section 1396a(e)(14) of Title 42 of the United States Code, except coverage of long-term services and supports shall be excluded unless otherwise required by Section 1396u-7(a)(2) of Title 42 of the United States Code or made available pursuant to subdivision (b).
 The alternative benefit package shall also include any benefits otherwise required by Section 1396u-7 of Title 42 of the United States Code and any regulations or guidance issued pursuant to that section.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 14005.64, and only to the extent federal approval is obtained, the department shall provide coverage for long-term services and supports to only those individuals who meet the asset requirements imposed under the Medi-Cal program for receipt of the services.

(c) For purposes of this section, long-term services and supports include nursing facility services, a level of care in any institution equivalent to nursing facility services, home- and community-based services furnished under the state plan or a waiver under Section 1315 or 1396n of Title 42 of the United States Code, home health services as described in Section 1396d(a)(7) of Title 42 of the
 United States Code, and personal care services described in Section 1396d(a)(24) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(d) The department may seek approval of any necessary state plan amendments or waivers to implement this section.

(e) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions until the time any necessary regulations are adopted. The department shall adopt regulations by July 1, 2017, in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Beginning six months after the effective date of this section, and notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the
 Government Code, the department shall provide a status report to the Legislature on a semiannual basis, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, until regulations have been adopted.

(f) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that federal financial participation is available and any necessary federal approvals have been obtained.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2013, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 28) by Stats. 2013, Ch. 442, Sec. 13.   (SB 28)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.025.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, emergency services and care necessary for the treatment of an emergency medical condition, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1317.1 of the Health and Safety Code, are a covered benefit.
 For purposes of this section, “emergency services and care” has the same meaning as defined in Section 438.114 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations and paragraph (1) of, and subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of, subdivision (a) of Section 1317.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) For a beneficiary with a psychiatric emergency medical condition, as defined in subdivision (k) of Section 1317.1 of the Health and Safety Code, emergency services and care necessary to relieve or eliminate that condition are covered, regardless of whether the beneficiary is voluntary, or involuntarily detained for
 assessment, evaluation, and crisis intervention, or placement for evaluation and treatment pursuant to the Lanterman-Petris-Short Act (Part 1 (commencing with Section 5000) of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code).

(c) (1) A Medi-Cal managed care plan, as defined in subdivision (j) of Section 14184.101, shall be responsible for covering, and reimbursing providers furnishing, the emergency services and care described in subdivisions (a) and (b), and any poststabilization care services required under Section 438.114 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations,
 for its enrolled Medi-Cal beneficiaries, excluding any Medi-Cal specialty mental health services provided once an enrolled beneficiary is admitted for inpatient psychiatric care.

(2) This subdivision does not limit or reduce the scope of covered emergency services and care described in subdivisions (a) and (b) for Medi-Cal fee-for-service beneficiaries.

(d) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-plan letters, information notices, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions
 until the department can promulgate any necessary regulations.

(e) For purposes of this section, emergency services and care includes emergency room professional services and facility charges for emergency room visits.

(f) This section shall be implemented in a manner consistent with federal law and only to the extent
 federal financial participation is available and not otherwise jeopardized.

(g) The Legislature finds and declares that this section is intended to clarify, and not expand, the scope of Medi-Cal covered benefits.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 632, Sec. 6.   (AB 1316)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.03.

(a) The following shall be covered Medi-Cal benefits effective January 1, 2014:

(1) Mental health services included in the essential health benefits package adopted by the state pursuant to Section 1367.005 of the Health and Safety Code and Section 10112.27 of the Insurance Code and approved by the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services under Section 18022 of Title 42 of the United States Code. To the extent behavioral health treatment services are considered mental health services pursuant to the essential health benefits package, these services shall only be provided to individuals who receive services through federally approved waivers or state plan amendments pursuant to the
 Lanterman Developmental Disability Services Act, at Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4500).

(2) Substance use disorder services included in the essential health benefits package adopted by the state pursuant to Section 1367.005 of the Health and Safety Code and Section 10112.27 of the Insurance Code and approved by the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services under Section 18022 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(b) The department may seek approval of any necessary state plan amendments to implement this section.

(c) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that federal financial participation is available and any necessary federal approvals have been obtained.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 29.   (SB 1 1x)   Effective September 30, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.05.

The department shall provide the fiscal and appropriate policy committees of the Legislature with a copy of their submittal to the federal Health Care Financing Administration pertaining to any evaluation completed regarding the Family PACT federal waiver required by subdivision (aa) of Section 14132.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 93, Sec. 90.   Effective July 7, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.06.

(a) Services specified in this section that are provided by a local educational agency are covered Medi-Cal benefits, to the extent federal financial participation is available, and subject to utilization controls and standards adopted by the department, and consistent with Medi-Cal requirements for physician prescription, order, and supervision.

(b) Any provider enrolled on or after January 1, 1993, to provide services pursuant to this section may bill for those services provided on or after January 1, 1993.

(c) This section shall not be interpreted to expand the current category of professional health care practitioners permitted to directly bill the Medi-Cal program.

(d) This section is not intended to increase the scope of practice of any health professional providing services under this section or Medi-Cal requirements for physician prescription, order, and supervision.

(e) (1) For the purposes of this section, the local educational agency, as a condition of enrollment to provide services under this section, shall be considered the provider of services. A local educational agency provider, as a condition of enrollment to provide services under this section, shall enter into, and maintain, a contract with the department in accordance with guidelines contained in regulations adopted by the director and published in Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a local educational agency providing services pursuant to this
 section shall utilize current safety net and traditional health care providers, when those providers are accessible to specific schoolsites identified by the local educational agency to participate in this program, rather than adding duplicate capacity.

(f) For the purposes of this section, covered services may include all of the following local educational agency services:

(1) Health and mental health evaluations and health and mental health education.

(2) Medical transportation.

(A) The following provisions shall not apply to medical transportation eligible to be billed under this section:

(i) Section 51323(a)(2)(A) of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(ii) Section 51323(a)(3)(B) of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(iii) For students whose medical or physical condition does not require the use of a gurney, Section 51231.1(f) of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(iv) For students whose medical or physical condition does not require the use of a wheelchair, Section 51231.2(e) of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(B) (i) Subparagraph (A) shall become inoperative on January 1, 2018, or on the date the director executes a declaration stating that the regulations implementing subparagraph (A) and Section 14115.8 have been updated, whichever is later.

(ii) The department shall post
 the declaration executed under clause (i) on its Internet Web site and transmit a copy of the declaration to the Assembly Committee on Budget and the Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review and the LEA Ad Hoc Workgroup.

(iii) If subparagraph (A) becomes inoperative on January 1, 2018, subparagraph (A) and this subparagraph shall be inoperative on January 1, 2018, unless a later enacted statute enacted before that date, deletes or extends that date.

(iv) If subparagraph (A) becomes inoperative on the date the director executes a declaration as described in clause (i), subparagraph (A) and this subparagraph shall be inoperative on the January 1 immediately following the date subparagraph (A) becomes inoperative, unless a later enacted statute enacted before that date, deletes or extends that date.

(3) Nursing
 services.

(4) Occupational therapy.

(5) Physical therapy.

(6) Physician services.

(7) Mental health and counseling services.

(8) School health aide services.

(9) Speech pathology services. These services may be provided by either of the following:

(A) A licensed speech pathologist.

(B) A credentialed speech-language pathologist, to the extent authorized by Chapter 5.3 (commencing with Section 2530) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(10) Audiology services.

(11) Targeted case management services for children regardless of whether the child has an individualized education plan (IEP) or an individualized family service plan (IFSP).

(g) Local educational agencies may, but need not, provide any or all of the services specified in subdivision (f).

(h) For the purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means the governing body of any school district or community college district, the county office of education, a charter school, a state special school, a California State University campus, or a University of California campus.

(i) Notwithstanding any other law, a community college district, a California State University
 campus, or a University of California campus, consistent with the requirements of this section, may bill for services provided to any student, regardless of age, who is a Medi-Cal recipient.

(j) No later than July 1, 2013, and every year thereafter, the department shall make publicly accessible an annual accounting of all funds collected by the department from federal Medicaid payments allocable to local educational agencies, including, but not limited to, the funds withheld pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 14115.8. The accounting shall detail amounts withheld from federal Medicaid payments to each participating local educational agency for that year. One-time costs for the development of this accounting shall not exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).

(k) (1) If the requirements in paragraphs (2) and (4) are satisfied, the department
 shall seek federal financial participation for covered services that are provided by a local educational agency pursuant to subdivision (a) to a child who is an eligible Medi-Cal beneficiary, regardless of either of the following:

(A) Whether the child has an IEP or an IFSP.

(B) Whether those same services are provided at no charge to the beneficiary or to the community at large.

(2) The local educational agency shall take all reasonable measures to ascertain and pursue claims for payment of covered services specified in this section against legally liable third parties pursuant to Section 1902(a)(25) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a(a)(25)).

(3) If a legally liable third party receives a claim submitted by a local educational
 agency pursuant to paragraph (2), the legally liable third party shall either reimburse the claim or issue a notice of denial of noncoverage of services or benefits. If there is no response to a claim submitted to a legally liable third party by a local educational agency within 45 days, the local educational agency may bill the Medi-Cal program pursuant to subdivision (b). The local educational agency shall retain a copy of the claim submitted to the legally liable third party for a period of three years.

(4) This subdivision shall not be implemented until the department obtains any necessary federal approvals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 320.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.07.

(a) A Medi-Cal managed care plan shall not restrict the choice of the qualified provider from whom a beneficiary enrolled in the managed care plan may receive family planning services covered by the Medi-Cal program pursuant to subdivision (n) of Section 14132.

(b) The following definitions shall apply for purposes of this section:

(1) “Medi-Cal managed care plan” means an applicable organization or entity that contracts with the department to provide services to enrolled Medi-Cal beneficiaries pursuant to any of the following:

(A) Article 2.7 (commencing with Section 14087.3).

(B) Article 2.8 (commencing with Section 14087.5).

(C) Article 2.81 (commencing with Section 14087.96).

(D) Article 2.82 (commencing with Section 14087.98).

(E) Article 2.91 (commencing with Section 14089).

(F) Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200).

(2) “Qualified provider” means a provider that is licensed to furnish family planning services, is an enrolled Medi-Cal provider, and is willing to furnish family planning services to an enrollee. A qualified provider may be an out-of-plan or out-of-network provider.

(c) A Medi-Cal managed care plan shall reimburse an out-of-plan or out-of-network qualified provider at the applicable fee-for-service rate.

(d) If federal approval is required to implement this section, the section shall be implemented only to the extent that federal approval is obtained.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 572, Sec. 3.   (SB 743)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.09.

(a) By July 1, 2024, biomarker testing, as specified in this section, is a covered benefit, subject to utilization controls and medical necessity requirements, as described in Section 14059.5. Biomarker testing shall be covered for the purposes of diagnosis, treatment, appropriate management, or ongoing monitoring of a Medi-Cal beneficiary’s disease or condition to guide treatment decisions. Coverage shall include biomarker tests that meet any of the following:

(1) A labeled indication for a test that has been approved or cleared by the United States Food and Drug Administration (FDA) or is an indicated test for an FDA-approved drug.

(2) A national coverage determination made by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, to the extent allowed under the Medicaid program.

(3) A local coverage determination made by a Medicare Administrative Contractor for California.

(4) Evidence-based clinical practice guidelines, supported by peer-reviewed literature and peer-reviewed scientific studies published in or accepted for publication by medical journals that meet nationally recognized requirements for scientific manuscripts and that submit most of their
 published articles for review by experts who are not part of the editorial staff.

(5) Standards set by the National Academy of Medicine.

(b) (1) This section does not preclude any obligation on a Medi-Cal managed care plan subject to Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, including any obligations under Section 1363.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) This section does not require coverage of biomarker testing for screening purposes unless otherwise required by this chapter.

(3) The department shall direct, by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar
 instructions, that biomarker testing is to be provided in a manner that limits disruptions in care.

(c) Restricted or denied use of biomarker testing for the purpose of diagnosis, treatment, or ongoing monitoring of any medical condition is subject to grievance and appeal processes under state and federal law.

(d) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that federal financial participation is available and not otherwise jeopardized, and any necessary federal approvals have been obtained.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, and make specific this section by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.

(2) An all-county letter, plan letter, plan or provider bulletin, or similar instructions promulgated pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be based at a minimum on
 evidence-based clinical practice guidelines.

(f) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Biomarker” means a characteristic that is objectively measured and evaluated as an indicator of normal biological processes, pathogenic processes, or pharmacologic responses to a specific therapeutic intervention. A biomarker includes, but is not limited to, gene mutations or protein expression.

(2) “Biomarker testing” is the analysis of an individual’s tissue, blood, or other biospecimen for the presence of a biomarker. Biomarker testing includes, but is not limited to, single-analyte tests, multiplex panel tests, and whole genome sequencing.

(g) This section is subject to the provisions of Section 1367.665 of the Health and Safety Code as amended by Chapter 605 of the Statutes of 2021 for a Medi-Cal beneficiary with advanced or metastatic stage III or IV cancer covered by a Medi-Cal managed care plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 401, Sec. 3.   (SB 496)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.1.

As used in this chapter “surgical center” means a surgical clinic that is licensed under Section 1203 of the Health and Safety Code. Pursuant to Section 14105, the director shall establish the rates of payment for services provided by surgical centers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 328, Sec. 36.   Effective June 30, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.10.

(a) (1) Pediatric day health care provided by a health facility licensed under paragraph (11) of subdivision (a) of Section 1250.1 of the Health and Safety Code is a covered benefit under this chapter subject to terms, conditions, and utilization controls developed by the department. Pediatric day health care does not include inpatient long-term care or family respite care.

(2) Pediatric day health care services may be provided at any time of the day and on any day of the week, so long as the total number of authorized hours is not exceeded. Pediatric
 day health care services may be covered for up to 23 hours per calendar day.

(b) The department shall publish emergency regulations for pediatric day health care services by October 1, 1997. These regulations shall reimburse providers at a rate that shall be determined by the department, consistent with efficiency, economy, and quality of care until a new rate is determined on the basis of a cost study conducted by the department.

(c) Coverage for pediatric day health care services shall be available only to the extent that no additional net program costs are incurred.

(d) The department shall not approve a request for authorization of pediatric day health care when the beneficiary for whom the
 authorization is requested is an inpatient in a licensed health care facility.

(e) The department shall not approve a request for authorization of pediatric day health care if the department determines that the total cost incurred by the Medi-Cal program for providing pediatric day health care services and all other medically necessary services to the individual beneficiary is greater than the total cost incurred by the Medi-Cal program in providing medically equivalent services at the beneficiary’s otherwise appropriate level of institutional or home care.

(f) Coverage for pediatric day health care services shall be available only to the extent that federal financial participation in the cost of providing these services is available pursuant to a federally approved state plan
 amendment including those services as a Medi-Cal program benefit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 64, Sec. 1.   (AB 781)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.100.

(a) The federally qualified health center services described in Section 1396d(a)(2)(C) of Title 42 of the United States Code are covered benefits.

(b) The rural health clinic services described in Section 1396d(a)(2)(B) of Title 42 of the United States Code are covered benefits.

(c) Federally qualified health center services and rural health clinic services shall be reimbursed on a per-visit basis in accordance with the definition of “visit” set forth in subdivision (g).

(d) Effective October 1, 2004, and on each October 1 thereafter, until no longer required by federal law, federally qualified health center (FQHC) and rural health
 clinic (RHC) per-visit rates shall be increased by the Medicare Economic Index applicable to primary care services in the manner provided for in Section 1396a(bb)(3)(A) of Title 42 of the United States Code. Prior to January 1, 2004, FQHC and RHC per-visit rates shall be adjusted by the Medicare Economic Index in accordance with the methodology set forth in the state plan in effect on October 1, 2001.

(e) (1) An FQHC or RHC may apply for an adjustment to its per-visit rate based on a change in the scope of services provided by the FQHC or RHC. Rate changes based on a change in the scope of services provided by an FQHC or RHC shall be evaluated in accordance with Medicare reasonable cost principles, as set forth in Part 413 (commencing with Section 413.1) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or its successor.

(2) Subject to the conditions set forth
 in subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, of paragraph (3), a change in scope of service means any of the following:

(A) The addition of a new FQHC or RHC service that is not incorporated in the baseline prospective payment system (PPS) rate, or a deletion of an FQHC or RHC service that is incorporated in the baseline PPS rate.

(B) A change in service due to amended regulatory requirements or rules.

(C) A change in service resulting from relocating or remodeling an FQHC or RHC.

(D) A change in types of services due to a change in applicable technology and medical practice utilized by the center or clinic.

(E) An increase in service intensity attributable to changes in the types of patients
 served, including, but not limited to, populations with HIV or AIDS, or other chronic diseases, or homeless, elderly, migrant, or other special populations.

(F) Any changes in any of the services described in subdivision (a) or (b), or in the provider mix of an FQHC or RHC or one of its sites.

(G) Changes in operating costs attributable to capital expenditures associated with a modification of the scope of any of the services described in subdivision (a) or (b), including new or expanded service facilities, regulatory compliance, or changes in technology or medical practices at the center or clinic.

(H) Indirect medical education adjustments and a direct graduate medical education payment that reflects the costs of providing teaching services to interns and residents.

(I) Any changes in the scope of a project approved by the federal Health Resources and Services Administration (HRSA).

(3) A change in costs is not, in and of itself, a scope-of-service change, unless all of the following apply:

(A) The increase or decrease in cost is attributable to an increase or decrease in the scope of services defined in subdivisions (a) and (b), as applicable.

(B) The cost is allowable under Medicare reasonable cost principles set forth in Part 413 (commencing with Section 413.1) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or its successor.

(C) The change in the scope of services is a change in the type, intensity, duration, or amount of services, or any combination
 thereof.

(D) The net change in the FQHC’s or RHC’s rate equals or exceeds 1.75 percent for the affected FQHC or RHC site. For FQHCs and RHCs that filed consolidated cost reports for multiple sites to establish the initial prospective payment reimbursement rate, the 1.75-percent threshold shall be applied to the average per-visit rate of all sites for the purposes of calculating the cost associated with a scope-of-service change. “Net change” means the per-visit rate change attributable to the cumulative effect of all increases and decreases for a particular fiscal year.

(4) An FQHC or RHC may submit requests for scope-of-service changes once per fiscal year, only within 90 days following the beginning of the FQHC’s or RHC’s fiscal year. Any approved increase or decrease in the provider’s rate shall be retroactive to the beginning of the FQHC’s or RHC’s fiscal year in which the
 request is submitted.

(5) An FQHC or RHC shall submit a scope-of-service rate change request within 90 days of the beginning of any FQHC or RHC fiscal year occurring after the effective date of this section, if, during the FQHC’s or RHC’s prior fiscal year, the FQHC or RHC experienced a decrease in the scope of services provided that the FQHC or RHC either knew or should have known would have resulted in a significantly lower per-visit rate. If an FQHC or RHC discontinues providing onsite pharmacy or dental services, it shall submit a scope-of-service rate change request within 90 days of the beginning of the following fiscal year. The rate change shall be effective as provided for in paragraph (4). As used in this paragraph, “significantly lower” means an average per-visit rate decrease in excess of 2.5 percent.

(6) Notwithstanding paragraph (4), if the approved scope-of-service
 change or changes were initially implemented on or after the first day of an FQHC’s or RHC’s fiscal year ending in calendar year 2001, but before the adoption and issuance of written instructions for applying for a scope-of-service change, the adjusted reimbursement rate for that scope-of-service change shall be made retroactive to the date the scope-of-service change was initially implemented. Scope-of-service changes under this paragraph shall be required to be submitted within the later of 150 days after the adoption and issuance of the written instructions by the department, or 150 days after the end of the FQHC’s or RHC’s fiscal year ending in 2003.

(7) All references in this subdivision to “fiscal year” shall be construed to be references to the fiscal year of the individual FQHC or RHC, as the case may be.

(f) (1) An FQHC or RHC may request a
 supplemental payment if extraordinary circumstances beyond the control of the FQHC or RHC occur after December 31, 2001, and PPS payments are insufficient due to these extraordinary circumstances. Supplemental payments arising from extraordinary circumstances under this subdivision shall be solely and exclusively within the discretion of the department and shall not be subject to subdivision (l). These supplemental payments shall be determined separately from the scope-of-service adjustments described in subdivision (e). Extraordinary circumstances include, but are not limited to, acts of nature, changes in applicable requirements in the Health and Safety Code, changes in applicable licensure requirements, and changes in applicable rules or regulations. Mere inflation of costs alone, absent extraordinary circumstances, shall not be grounds for supplemental payment. If an FQHC’s or RHC’s PPS rate is sufficient to cover its overall costs, including those associated with the extraordinary circumstances, then a
 supplemental payment is not warranted.

(2) The department shall accept requests for supplemental payment at any time throughout the prospective payment rate year.

(3) Requests for supplemental payments shall be submitted in writing to the department and shall set forth the reasons for the request. Each request shall be accompanied by sufficient documentation to enable the department to act upon the request. Documentation shall include the data necessary to demonstrate that the circumstances for which supplemental payment is requested meet the requirements set forth in this section. Documentation shall include both of the following:

(A) A presentation of data to demonstrate reasons for the FQHC’s or RHC’s request for a supplemental payment.

(B) Documentation showing the cost implications. The cost impact shall be material and significant, two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) or 1 percent of a facility’s total costs, whichever is less.

(4) A request shall be submitted for each affected year.

(5) Amounts granted for supplemental payment requests shall be paid as lump-sum amounts for those years and not as revised PPS rates, and shall be repaid by the FQHC or RHC to the extent that it is not expended for the specified purposes.

(6) The department shall notify the provider of the department’s discretionary decision in writing.

(g) (1) An FQHC or RHC “visit” means a face-to-face encounter between an FQHC or RHC patient and a physician, physician assistant,
 nurse practitioner, certified nurse-midwife, clinical psychologist, licensed clinical social worker, licensed professional clinical counselor, or a visiting nurse. A visit shall also include a face-to-face encounter between an FQHC or RHC patient and a comprehensive perinatal practitioner, as defined in Section 51179.7 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, providing comprehensive perinatal services, a four-hour day of attendance at an adult day health care center, and any other provider identified in the state plan’s definition of an FQHC or RHC visit.

(2) (A) A visit shall also include a face-to-face encounter between an FQHC or RHC patient and a dental hygienist, a dental hygienist in alternative practice, or a marriage and family therapist.

(B) Notwithstanding subdivision (e), if an FQHC or RHC that currently includes the cost of the services
 of a dental hygienist in alternative practice, or a marriage and family therapist for the purposes of establishing its FQHC or RHC rate chooses to bill these services as a separate visit, the FQHC or RHC shall apply for an adjustment to its per-visit rate, and, after the rate adjustment has been approved by the department, shall bill these services as a separate visit. However, multiple encounters with dental professionals or marriage and family therapists that take place on the same day shall constitute a single visit. The department shall develop the appropriate forms to determine which FQHC’s or RHC’s rates shall be adjusted and to facilitate the calculation of the adjusted rates. An FQHC’s or RHC’s application for, or the department’s approval of, a rate adjustment pursuant to this subparagraph shall not constitute a change in scope of service within the meaning of subdivision (e). An FQHC or RHC that applies for an adjustment to its rate pursuant to this subparagraph may continue to bill for all other
 FQHC or RHC visits at its existing per-visit rate, subject to reconciliation, until the rate adjustment for visits between an FQHC or RHC patient and a dental hygienist, a dental hygienist in alternative practice, or a marriage and family therapist has been approved. Any approved increase or decrease in the provider’s rate shall be made within six months after the date of receipt of the department’s rate adjustment forms pursuant to this subparagraph and shall be retroactive to the beginning of the fiscal year in which the FQHC or RHC submits the request, but in no case shall the effective date be earlier than January 1, 2008.

(C) An FQHC or RHC that does not provide dental hygienist or dental hygienist in alternative practice services, and later elects to add these services and bill these services as a separate visit, shall process the addition of these services as a change in scope of service pursuant to subdivision (e).

(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, no later than July 1, 2018, a visit shall include a marriage and family therapist.

(4) (A) (i) Subject to subparagraphs (C) and (D), a visit shall also include an encounter between an FQHC or RHC patient and a physician, physician assistant, nurse practitioner, certified nurse-midwife, clinical psychologist, licensed clinical social worker, licensed professional clinical counselor, visiting nurse, comprehensive perinatal services program practitioner, dental hygienist, dental hygienist in alternative practice, or marriage and family therapist using video synchronous interaction, when services delivered through that interaction meet the applicable standard of care. A visit described in this clause shall be reimbursed at the applicable FQHC’s or RHC’s per-visit PPS rate to the extent
 the department determines that the FQHC or RHC has met all billing requirements that would have applied if the applicable services were delivered via a face-to-face encounter. An FQHC or RHC is not precluded from establishing a new patient relationship through video synchronous interaction. An FQHC patient who receives telehealth services shall otherwise be eligible to receive in-person services from that FQHC pursuant to HRSA requirements.
